New York, session 2025-2026, A4161.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 722.23 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by section 1-a of part WWW of chapter 3 59 of the laws of 2017 and subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (c) of subdi- 4 vision 2 as amended by section 1 part AA of chapter 55 of the laws of 5 2024, is amended to read as follows: 6 (c) The court shall order the action to proceed in accordance with 7 subdivision one of this section unless, after reviewing the papers and 8 hearing from the parties, the court determines in writing that the 9 district attorney proved by a preponderance of the evidence one or more 10 of the following as set forth in the accusatory instrument: 11 (i) the defendant caused significant physical injury to a person other 12 than a participant in the offense; or 13 (ii) the defendant displayed a firearm, shotgun, rifle or deadly weap- 14 on as defined in the penal law in furtherance of such offense; or 15 (iii) the defendant possessed a loaded firearm as defined in subdivi- 16 sion fifteen of section 265.00 of the penal law during the commission of 17 the offense; or 18 (iv) the defendant unlawfully engaged in vaginal sexual contact, oral 19 sexual contact, anal sexual contact, or sexual contact as defined in 20 section 130.00 of the penal law. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03353-01-5